Utah statutes.
55-5-4.   "Blind person" defined -- Certification of blindness.
As used in this act the term "blind person" means a person who is blind
according to the definitions prescribed by the Division of Vocational
Rehabilitation and expressed in terms of ophthalmic measurements. Such
blindness shall be certified by duly state licensed ophthalmologist.
